Maine, session 132, LD360.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
EDUCATION, DEPARTMENT OF
School Finance and Operations Z078
Initiative: Provides one-time funds in fiscal year 2025-26 and fiscal year 2026-27 only to
support the Dirigo Reads program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $100,000 $100,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $100,000 $100,000